Utah statutes.
17C-1-405.   Tax increment under a project area plan adopted on or after May 1, 2006.

(1)  This section applies to tax increment under a project area plan adopted on or after May 1, 2006.

(2)  Subject to the approval of the taxing entity committee, an agency board may provide in the urban renewal or economic development project area budget for the agency to be paid:

(a)  for an urban renewal project area plan that proposes development of an inactive industrial site or inactive airport site, at least 60% of tax increment for at least 20 years; or

(b)  for each other project, any percentage of tax increment up to 100% or any specified dollar amount of tax increment for any period of time.

(3)  A resolution or interlocal agreement relating to an agency's use of tax increment for a community development project area plan may provide for the agency to be paid any percentage of tax increment up to 100% or any specified dollar amount of tax increment for any period of time.

